lib/dict/lv_LV.aff
SFX W Y 32
SFX W  s     ajai   [s]
SFX W  s     u      [s]
SFX W  s     ais    [s]
SFX W  s     am     [s]
SFX W  s     as     [s]
SFX W  s     ajiem  [s]
SFX W  s     ai     [s]
SFX W  s     ajâ    [s]
SFX W  s     o      [s]
SFX W  s     ie     [s]
SFX W  s     ajâs   [s]
SFX W  s     â      [s]
SFX W  s     a      [s]
SFX W  s     âs     [s]
SFX W  s     âm     [s]
SFX W  s     ajos   [s]
SFX W  s     ajam   [s]
SFX W  s     ajâm   [s]
SFX W  ð     o      [ð]
SFX W  ð     ai     [ð]
SFX W  ð     ajam   [ð]
SFX W  ð     ajiem  [ð]
SFX W  ð     ajai   [ð]
SFX W  ð     ajâ    [ð]
SFX W  ð     ie     [ð]
SFX W  ð     âm     [ð]
SFX W  ð     ais    [ð]
SFX W  ð     ajâm   [ð]
SFX W  ð     âs     [ð]
SFX W  ð     as     [ð]
SFX W  ð     ajâs   [ð]
SFX W  ð     ajos   [ð]

SFX Y Y 42
SFX Y  s     âk      [s]
SFX Y  s     âks     [s]
SFX Y  s     âka     [s]
SFX Y  s     âkas    [s]
SFX Y  s     âkam    [s]
SFX Y  s     âkai    [s]
SFX Y  s     âku     [s]
SFX Y  s     âkâ     [s]
SFX Y  s     âki     [s]
SFX Y  s     âkiem   [s]
SFX Y  s     âkâm    [s]
SFX Y  s     âkus    [s]
SFX Y  s     âkos    [s]
SFX Y  s     âkâs    [s]
SFX Y  ð     âk      [ð]
SFX Y  ð     âks     [ð]
SFX Y  ð     âka     [ð]
SFX Y  ð     âkas    [ð]
SFX Y  ð     âkam    [ð]
SFX Y  ð     âkai    [ð]
SFX Y  ð     âku     [ð]
SFX Y  ð     âkâ     [ð]
SFX Y  ð     âki     [ð]
SFX Y  ð     âkiem   [ð]
SFX Y  ð     âkâm    [ð]
SFX Y  ð     âkus    [ð]
SFX Y  ð     âkos    [ð]
SFX Y  ð     âkâs    [ð]
SFX Y  0     tâk      [âçîo]t
SFX Y  0     tâks     [âçîo]t
SFX Y  0     tâka     [âçîo]t
SFX Y  0     tâkas    [âçîo]t
SFX Y  0     tâkam    [âçîo]t
SFX Y  0     tâkai    [âçîo]t
SFX Y  0     tâku     [âçîo]t
SFX Y  0     tâkâ     [âçîo]t
SFX Y  0     tâki     [âçîo]t
SFX Y  0     tâkiem   [âçîo]t
SFX Y  0     tâkâm    [âçîo]t
SFX Y  0     tâkus    [âçîo]t
SFX Y  0     tâkos    [âçîo]t
SFX Y  0     tâkâs    [âçîo]t



SFX X Y 20
SFX X  s     âkais   [s]
SFX X  s     âkajam  [s]
SFX X  s     âkajai  [s]
SFX X  s     âko     [s]
SFX X  s     âkajâ   [s]
SFX X  s     âkie    [s]
SFX X  s     âkajiem [s]
SFX X  s     âkajâm  [s]
SFX X  s     âkajos  [s]
SFX X  s     âkajâs  [s]
SFX X  ð     âkais   [ð]
SFX X  ð     âkajam  [ð]
SFX X  ð     âkajai  [ð]
SFX X  ð     âko     [ð]
SFX X  ð     âkajâ   [ð]
SFX X  ð     âkie    [ð]
SFX X  ð     âkajiem [ð]
SFX X  ð     âkajâm  [ð]
SFX X  ð     âkajos  [ð]
SFX X  ð     âkajâs  [ð]

SFX y Y 13
SFX y  ais   0       [a]is
SFX y  ais   â       [a]is
SFX y  ais   âs      [a]is
SFX y  is    jam     [a]is
SFX y  is    jai     [a]is
SFX y  ais   o       [a]is
SFX y  is    jâ      [a]is
SFX y  ais   ie      [a]is
SFX y  is    jiem    [a]is
SFX y  is    jâm     [a]is
SFX y  ais   os      [a]is
SFX y  is    jos     [a]is
SFX y  is    jâs     [a]is


SFX q Y 45
SFX q  i   u    [i]
SFX q  i   as   [i]
SFX q  i   iem  [i]
SFX q  i   âm   [i]
SFX q  i   âs   [i]
SFX q  i   os   [i]
SFX q  i   us   [i]
SFX q  ais  â     [a]is
SFX q  ais  o     [a]is
SFX q  ais  âs    [a]is
SFX q  ais  os    [a]is
SFX q  ais  ie    [a]is
SFX q  is   jam   [a]is
SFX q  is   jâ    [a]is
SFX q  is   jai   [a]is
SFX q  is   jiem  [a]is
SFX q  is   jos   [a]is
SFX q  is   jâm   [a]is
SFX q  is   jâs   [a]is
SFX q  0   ais   [t]
SFX q  0   â     [t]
SFX q  0   o     [t]
SFX q  0   âs    [t]
SFX q  0   os    [t]
SFX q  0   ie    [t]
SFX q  0   ajam  [t]
SFX q  0   ajâ   [t]
SFX q  0   ajai  [t]
SFX q  0   ajiem [t]
SFX q  0   ajos  [t]
SFX q  0   ajâm  [t]
SFX q  0   ajâs  [t]
SFX q  ð   ðais  [ð]
SFX q  0   â     [ð]
SFX q  0   o     [ð]
SFX q  0   âs    [ð]
SFX q  0   os    [ð]
SFX q  0   ie    [ð]
SFX q  0   ajam  [ð]
SFX q  0   ajâ   [ð]
SFX q  0   ajai  [ð]
SFX q  0   ajiem [ð]
SFX q  0   ajos  [ð]
SFX q  0   ajâm  [ð]
SFX q  0   ajâs  [ð]
