lib/dict/lv_LV.dic
agrîns/WiYX
aizbâşamâks/+Wi
aizdzijuğais/q+
aizgâjuğais/q+
aizknituğais/q+
aizkûruğais/+q
aizmetuğais/q+
aizmûkoğs/iW+
aizpïâvuğais/q+
aizskrçjuğais/q+
aizspïâvuğais/q+
aizvelkams/iX+W
aizvçmuğais/+q
aizòçmuğais/q+
akcesors/Wi
aktuâls/WiYX+
alkatîgs/WiYX
analoìisks/Wi
anomâls/WiYX
apberamâks/W+i
apbrienams/W+XiO
apdzijuğais/q+
apjautuğais/q+
apkrimtuğais/+q
apkrâpjamâks/Wi+
apkâvuğais/q+
apmetuğais/+q
appinams/X+Wi
appletuğais/q+
applçğoğs/iW+
aprâvuğais/q+
apskâvuğais/q+
apstûmuğais/q+
aptuvens/WiYX
aptvçruğais/q+
apâtisks/WiXY
apíçruğais/+q
artropâtisks/Wi
astotais/q
astoòpadsmit/q
astronomisks/WiYX
atbïâvuğais/+q
atdveğams/+WOi
atdzçruğais/q+
atgâjuğais/+q
atkrituğais/+q
atlçjuğais/+q
atpakaïejoğs/Wi
atpïâvuğais/q+
atriebîgs/WiYX
atsituğais/+q
atslçjuğais/q+
atstûmuğais/q+
atsçşams/Wi+
atvçmuğais/q+
atğíirîgs/WiYX+
atğíîruğais/q+
augstraşîgs/WiYX
aukstumizturîgs/Wi
autoritârs/WiYX
aègârns/WiXY
balts/WiYX+
bargs/WiYX
baudkârîgs/WiYX
bezgarğîgs/WiYX
bezkaunîgs/WiYX
bikls/WiYX
bikonisks/Wi
blçdîgs/WiYX
brienoğs/+Wi
brâlîgs/WiXY
brîniğíîgs/WiYX
bârdains/WiYX
bçrniğíîgs/WiYX
bïâvuğais/q+
caurs/WiYX
ciets/WiYX
cieğs/WiYX
citoplazmatisks/Wi
cûcisks/WiYX
daudzkârtçjs/Wi
daudzpieredzçjuğais/q
daudzvietîgs/WiYX
derdzîgs/WiYX
derîgs/WiYX+
desmits/Wi
deviòsimttûkstoğ/q
diskutabls/WiYX+
divcollîgs/Wi
divsimt/q
diçtisks/WiYX
drastisks/WiYX
draudoğâks/i+W
draudzîgs/WiYX+
drûms/WiYX
dubïains/WiYX
dzestrs/WiYX
dzeòveidîgs/Wi
dzirdîgs/WiYX+
dçmonisks/WiYX
dîgtspçjîgs/WiXY
eitektisks/Wi
eksakts/WiYX
eksplozîvs/WiYX
elektrometrisks/Wi
emocionâls/WiYX+
enerìisks/WiYX
errîgs/WiYX
fantastisks/WiYX
filigrâns/WiXY+
fizioloìisks/Wi
futûristisks/WiYX
gaisîgs/WiYX
gaiğzils/WiXY
garkâjains/WiYX
garâmgâjuğais/q+
garîgs/WiYX
gigantisks/WiYX
glezns/WiYX
glîzdens/WiXY
godbijîgs/WiYX+
godîgs/WiYX+
greizsirdîgs/WiYX
grozîgs/WiYX
grûtsirdîgs/WiYX
guïoğs/Wi+
gâdîgs/WiYX
higroskopisks/WiYX
hiperbolisks/Wi
hronisks/WiYX
iecietîgs/WiYX+
iecçrtoğs/W+i
iedzçruğais/+q
iegarens/WiYX
iekrimtuğais/q+
iekutçtais/y
ielecamâks/+iW
ielçjuğais/q+
iepleğams/OX+Wi
iepriekğsagatavots/Wi
ierijuğais/+q
iestûmuğais/q+
ietinoğs/W+i
iezîmîgs/WiYX
ieğâvuğais/q+
igaunisks/WiYX
imunohematoloìisks/Wi
individuâls/WiYX
industriâls/WiYX
inşeniertehnisks/Wi
ironisks/WiYX+
iteratîvs/WiYX
izdzçruğais/q+
izjûtams/+XWi
izkrâvuğais/+q
izmanîgs/WiYX+
izmituğais/q+
izotermisks/Wi
izrâvuğais/+q
izsmeïoğs/WiYX+
izstûmuğais/+q
izsçşams/Wi+
izturîgs/WiYX+
izòçmuğais/q+
jaunapgûts/Wi
jauneklîgs/WiYX
jauniòğ/WXXO
jutîgs/WiYX+
jûtîgs/WiYX+
kairs/WiYX
kaltuğais/+q
kardinâls/WiYX
kareivîgs/WiYX
karstgalvîgs/WiYX
kaïams/+iWX
klajğ/WiYXO
klâjenisks/Wi
kokains/WiYX
kolosâls/WiYX
koncentrisks/WiYX
konkurçtspçjîgs/WiYX+
konspiratîvs/WiYX
kosmçtisks/Wi
krampjains/WiYX
kraujğ/WiYXO
krokains/WiYX
krunkains/WiYX
krâvuğais/q+
krçjumains/Wi
kunkuïains/WiXY
kurls/WiYX
kvçlinâmâks/i+W
kârpains/WiXY
kïûdains/WiXY
labs/XWivY+
laidens/WiYX
latents/WiYX
latvisks/WiYX+
lekns/WiYX
lielgraudains/WiYX
lielvalstisks/WiXY
lielîgs/WiYX
lietiğíîgs/WiXY
lijuğais/q+
lipîgs/WiYX
lumbosakrâls/Wi
lustîgs/WiYX
lçnprâtîgs/WiYX
lîdzjûtîgs/WiYX
lîkumains/WiXY
magnijsaturoğs/Wi
maksâtspçjîgs/WiYX
mantîgs/WiYX
mazauglîgs/WiYX
mazisks/WiXY
mazizturîgs/WiYX
mazpienîgs/WiYX
mazsaturîgs/WiYX
meistarîgs/WiYX
melnbârdains/Wi
melns/WiYX
metilçnzilais/q
meşains/WiYX
miermîlîgs/WiYX+
miglains/WiYX
minimâls/WiYX
mokpilns/WiYX
monofunkcionâls/Wi
mulss/WiYX
mutîgs/WiYX
mâkoğs/W+i
mânîgs/WiYX
mçms/WiYX
mîlîgs/WiYX+
nacionâlistisks/WiYX
narkoloìisks/Wi
nazâls/WiYX
neatsîcams/OWi
nedzîvdzimuğais/q
neizkrauts/Wi
nepasmelts/iW
nepâríçrkts/Wi
nervozs/WiYX
nievîgs/Wi
nihilistisks/WiYX
nogâjuğais/+q
nokarens/WiYX
nokrîtoğs/+Wi
nokurcuğais/+q
nonesams/X+
nopïâvuğais/q+
noraudams/+OWi
noskârtuğais/q+
notçğoğs/+Wi
novijuğais/+q
novîdîgs/WiYX+
nulltais/q
nâtns/WiYX
obligâts/Wi+
olimpisks/WiYX
optisks/WiYX
oïains/WiYX
pacieğams/+XWiO
padzçruğais/q+
pajauns/Wi
pakalpîgs/WiYX
pakrituğais/q+
paliess/Wi
palsens/WiYX
pametuğais/+q
pamâcoğâkais/y
pamîksts/WiYX
papoğoğs/+Wi
paprasts/WiYX
parocîgs/WiYX+
parâvuğais/q+
pasalts/WiYX
paslinks/WiXY
pastûmuğais/+q
pasîvs/WiYX
patekoğs/+iW
patriarhâls/WiYX
pavasarîgs/WiYX
paviegls/WiXY
pazeïoğs/iW+
paíçruğais/+q
pağlepns/WiYX
pağpârliecinâts/WiYX
pağvaks/Wi
perspektîvs/WiYX+
piebûruğais/q+
piecdesmitkârtîgs/Wi
piecsimttûkstoğ/q
pieklimtuğais/q+
piekrîtoğs/+Wi
piekïâvuğais/q+
piemâvuğais/q+
pienesams/+X
pienîgs/WiYX
piepoğoğs/+Wi
piesituğais/+q
piesutuğais/q+
pievelkams/XW+i
pieğâvuğais/q+
pilnasinîgs/WiYX
piparots/WiYX
pirktspçjîgs/Wi
piòòains/WiYX
pluğíains/WiXY
plâkğòveidîgs/Wi
plûksnains/WiYX
portretisks/Wi
poçtisks/WiYX
pretimbraucoğais/q
prettiesisks/WiYX
primitîvs/WiYX
progresîvs/WiYX+
pseidokritisks/Wi
puicisks/WiYX
pusgars/Wi
pârbrûkoğs/iW+
pârdzçruğais/q+
pârejams/+iXWY
pârgudrs/WiYX
pârkrimtuğais/q+
pârlejamâks/+iW
pârmituğais/q+
pârskrçjuğais/+q
pârskujoğs/W+i
pârtvçruğais/q+
pâròçmuğais/q+
pçrkoòains/WiYX
radioaktîvs/WiYX+
rakstains/WiXY
represîvs/WiYX
revolucionârs/WiYX
riebîgs/WiYX
roòveidîgs/Wi
rupjgraudains/WiYX
rûtains/WiYX
sabïâvuğais/q+
sagâjuğais/q+
sakâvuğais/q+
salcietîgs/WiYX
salizturîgs/WiYX
sapletuğais/q+
sarains/WiYX
sarkanbaltzaïais/q
sarkanîgs/WiYX
saslçjuğais/q+
sasâpçtais/y
sasçrğams/O+Wi
savrups/WiYX
savçmuğais/q+
selektîvs/WiYX
septiòdesmit/q
septiòkârtîgs/Wi
sestais/q
simt/q
sirreâls/WiYX
skanîgs/WiYX+
skumjğ/WiOYX
slikts/WiYX+
slîkğòains/WiYX
smçjuğais/q+
spalvains/WiXY
spiedzîgs/WiYX
sportisks/WiYX+
staipîgs/WiYX
stigrs/WiYX
substantîvs/Wi
superîgs/WiYX
svarîgs/WiYX+
sçrsnains/WiYX
sîklapains/WiYX
taustekïveidîgs/Wi
tiesîgs/WiYX+
tikumisks/WiYX+
transitîvs/Wi
trejdeviòi/q
trâpîgs/WiYX
trîstûkstoğ/q
trûdains/WiXY
tçlniecisks/Wi
tûïîgs/WiYX
ugunsdroğs/WiYX
uzdevuğais/q+
uzknituğais/+q
uzmetuğais/+q
uzmiegams/W+i
uzslçjuğais/+q
uzticamâkais/y
uzticîgs/WiYX+
uzvijuğais/+q
vairâkkârtçjs/Wi
valdonîgs/WiYX
veiksmîgs/WiYX+
veìetârs/WiYX
vienmçrîgs/WiYX+
vijuğais/q+
vijîgs/WiYX
visaerobâkais/y
visaizsargâjamâkais/y
visakûtâkais/y
visanonîmâkais/y
visapgrûtinoğâkais/y
visapíçrîgâkais/y
visastronomiskâkais/y
visatpalikuğâkais/y
visaudzelîgâkais/y
visauğîgâkais/y
visbaltâkais/y
visbezjçdzîgâkais/y
visbijîgâkais/y
visbrizantâkais/y
visbâlganâkais/y
viscelmainâkais/y
viscirkulârâkais/y
visdaiïâkais/y
visdekoratîvâkais/y
visdievbijîgâkais/y
visdişenâkais/y
visdrausmîgâkais/y
visdvçselîgâkais/y
visdzîvotspçjîgâkais/y
visefektîvâkais/y
viselegantâkais/y
viseventuâlâkais/y
visfrivolâkais/y
visgarlaicîgâkais/y
visglîzdainâkais/y
visgreizsirdîgâkais/y
visgrûtâkais/y
vishomogçnâkais/y
visiekârojamâkais/y
visietilpîgâkais/y
visindividuâlâkais/y
visironiskâkais/y
visizpirktâkais/y
visizğíiroğâkais/y
visjutîgâkais/y
viskankarainâkais/y
viskaïíainâkais/y
viskoloniâlâkais/y
viskonspektîvâkais/y
viskrampjainâkais/y
viskrunkainâkais/y
viskuslâkais/y
viskïûdainâkais/y
vislaipnâkais/y
visliberâlâkais/y
vislietiğíâkais/y
vislâcîgâkais/y
vislîdzîgâkais/y
vismantkârîgâkais/y
vismazkustîgâkais/y
vismeistarîgâkais/y
vismiesîgâkais/y
vismokoğâkais/y
vismçmâkais/y
visneakadçmiskâkais/y
visnecaurlaidîgâkais/y
visnegaidîtâkais/y
visneizskatîgâkais/y
visnelabâkais/y
visnenoturîgâkais/y
visnepieejamâkais/y
visnepârspîlçtâkais/y
visneskarbâkais/y
visnetehniskâkais/y
visnevienâdâkais/y
visnopietnâkais/y
vispamanâmâkais/y
vispağaizliedzîgâkais/y
vispieredzçjuğâkais/y
visplatoniskâkais/y
vispretenciozâkais/y
vispusîgâkais/y
visracionâlâkais/y
visrespektablâkais/y
visrûpîgâkais/y
vissapratîgâkais/y
vissazarotâkais/y
vissistemâtiskâkais/y
vissliktâkais/y
visspalvainâkais/y
visspîtîgâkais/y
visstîgrâkais/y
vissvîtrainâkais/y
vistaukâkais/y
vistotalitârâkais/y
vistvirtâkais/y
visuvarenais/y
visvaraskârâkais/y
visvieglprâtîgâkais/y
visvitâlâkais/y
visvîriğíîgâkais/y
viszvçrinâtâkais/y
visèemurainâkais/y
visîstâkais/y
visğíelmîgâkais/y
visşâkïainâkais/y
vulgârs/WiYX
vçrienîgs/WiYX
vçss/WiYX
zemisks/WiYX
ziòkârîgs/WiYX
âriğíîgs/WiYX
âíveidîgs/Wi
çrts/WiYX+
èetrpadsmit/q
íçniğíîgs/WiYX
ïaundabîgs/WiYX+
ïaundarîgs/WiYX
ğvaukstîgs/WiYX
ğíituğais/q+
ğíîbs/WiYX
şçls/WiYX
